Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2364.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "physical therapy" in section 2 of the act of October 10, 1975 (P.L.383, No.110), known as the Physical Therapy Practice Act, is amended and the section is amended by adding a definition to read:Section 2. Definitions.--The following definitions shall apply, when used in this act, unless otherwise expressed therein:* * *"Dry needling" shall mean a physical intervention that uses a filiform needle to stimulate trigger points and diagnose and treat neuromuscular pain and functional movement deficits. The 123456789101112131415161718 term does not include the stimulation of auricular or any other points based upon areas of oriental medicine or the practice of acupuncture under the act of February 14, 1986 (P.L.2, No.2), known as the "Acupuncture Licensure Act."* * *"Physical therapy" means any of the following:(1) The evaluation, examination and testing of individuals with mechanical, physiological and developmental impairments, functional limitations and disabilities, other health-related or movement-related conditions, performed to determine a diagnosis, prognosis and plan of treatment intervention within the scope of this act or to assess the ongoing effects of intervention.(2) The performance of tests and measurements as an aid in diagnosis or evaluation of function and the treatment of the individual through the utilization of the effective properties of physical measures such as mechanical stimulation, dry needling, heat, cold, light, air, water, electricity, sound, massage or mobilization-manual therapy.(3) The use of therapeutic exercises and rehabilitative procedures, including training in functional activities, with or without the utilization of assistive devices, for the purpose of limiting or preventing disability and alleviating or correcting any physical or mental conditions.(4) Reducing the risk of injury, impairment, functional limitation and disability, including the promotion and maintenance of fitness, health and wellness in populations of all ages as well as engaging in administration, consultation, education and research.* * *Section 2. Section 4 of the act is amended by adding a 20260HB2364PN3145 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 subsection to read:Section 4. Training and License Required; Exceptions.--* * *(a.1) A licensed physical therapist may only perform dry needling upon the successful completion of a dry needling certification program approved by the board.* * *Section 3. Section 9.1(c) introductory paragraph of the act is amended to read:Section 9.1. Physical Therapist Assistant; Education and Examination; Scope of Duties; Certification.--* * *(c) A physical therapist assistant while assisting a licensed physical therapist in the practice of physical therapy shall only perform patient-related physical therapy acts and services that are assigned or delegated by and under the supervision of a licensed physical therapist. Such acts and services of a physical therapist assistant shall not include evaluation, testing, dry needling, interpretation, planning or modification of patient programs. For purposes of this section the term "supervision" means as follows:* * *Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2364PN3145 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021